Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4071.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 25-319, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE25-319. Spousal maintenance; supreme court guidelines; computation factors; court jurisdiction A. In a proceeding for dissolution of marriage or legal separation, or a proceeding for maintenance following dissolution of the marriage by a court that lacked personal jurisdiction over the absent spouse, the court may grant a maintenance order for either spouse for any of the following reasons if it the court finds that the spouse seeking maintenance: 1. Lacks sufficient property, including property apportioned to the spouse, to provide for that spouse's reasonable needs. 2. Lacks earning ability in the labor market that is adequate to be self-sufficient. 3. Is the parent of a child whose age or condition is such that the parent should not be required to seek employment outside the home. 4. Has made a significant financial or other contribution to the education, training, vocational skills, career or earning ability of the other spouse or has significantly reduced that spouse's income or career opportunities for the benefit of the other spouse. 5. Had a marriage of long duration and is of an age that may preclude the possibility of gaining employment adequate to be self-sufficient. B. The supreme court shall establish guidelines for determining and awarding spousal maintenance. The court may award spousal maintenance pursuant to the guidelines only for a period of time and in an amount necessary to enable the receiving spouse to become self-sufficient. The amount of spousal maintenance resulting from the application of the guidelines shall be the amount of spousal maintenance ordered by the court, unless the court finds in writing that applying the guidelines would be inappropriate or unjust. The supreme court shall base the guidelines and criteria for deviation from the guidelines on the following relevant factors listed in paragraphs 1 through 13 of this subsection and as considered together and weighed in conjunction with each other: 1. The standard of living established during the marriage. 2. The duration of the marriage. 3. The age, employment history, earning ability and physical and emotional condition of the spouse seeking maintenance. 4. The ability of the spouse from whom maintenance is sought to meet that spouse's needs while meeting those of the spouse seeking maintenance. 5. The comparative financial resources of the spouses, including their comparative earning abilities in the labor market. 6. The contribution of the spouse seeking maintenance to the earning ability of the other spouse. 7. The extent to which the spouse seeking maintenance has reduced that spouse's income or career opportunities for the benefit of the other spouse. 8. The ability of both parties after the dissolution to contribute to the future educational costs of their mutual children. 9. The financial resources of the party spouse seeking maintenance, including marital property apportioned to that spouse, and that spouse's ability to meet that spouse's own needs independently. 10. The time necessary to acquire sufficient education or training to enable the party spouse seeking maintenance to find appropriate employment and whether such education or training is readily available. 11. Excessive or abnormal expenditures, destruction, concealment or fraudulent disposition of community, joint tenancy and other property held in common. 12. The cost for the spouse who is seeking maintenance to obtain health insurance and the reduction in the cost of health insurance for the spouse from whom maintenance is sought if the spouse from whom maintenance is sought is able to convert family health insurance to employee health insurance after the marriage is dissolved. 13. All actual damages and judgments from conduct that resulted in criminal conviction of either spouse in which the other spouse or a child was the victim. C. A maintenance order shall be made without regard to marital misconduct. D. If both parties agree, the maintenance order and a decree of dissolution of marriage or of legal separation may state that its maintenance terms shall not be modified. E. Except as provided in subsection D of this section or section 25-317, subsection G, the court shall maintain continuing jurisdiction over the issue of maintenance for the period of time maintenance is awarded. F. Notwithstanding any other law, the court may not grant a maintenance order from an injured spouse to a spouse who has been convicted of an act of domestic violence against the injured spouse. for the purposes of this subsection: 1. "Domestic violence" has the same meaning prescribed in section 13-3601. 2. "injured spouse" means The spouse who was the subject of an act of domestic violence for which the other spouse was convicted. END_STATUTE